Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,104
Release of data; other sections applicable.

All data and information developed or collected pursuant to the Parkinson's Disease Registry Act and the receipt and release of data from the Parkinson's Disease Registry is subject to and shall comply with sections 81-663 to 81-675. For purposes of the Parkinson's Disease Registry, data may be released as Class I data, Class II data, Class III data, or Class IV data as classified in section 81-667.

Laws 2001, LB 152, § 12.